District of Columbia statutes.
18-106

Creditors as competent witnesses.

A mere charge in a will or codicil on the estate of a testator for the payment of debts does not disqualify a creditor from being a competent witness to the will or codicil.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 686, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 18-106.
1973 Ed., § 18-106.